local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="vid/eti__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>im</l>
         <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>iš</l>
         <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>i</l>
         <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>imo</l>
         <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ite</l>
         <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- This paradigm probably needs fixing -->
    <pardef n="mol/iti__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>iti</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>i</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>im</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>iš</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>i</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>imo</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ite</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijah</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijaše</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijaše</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijasmo</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijaste</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijahu</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ih</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>i</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>i</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ismo</l>
         <r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>iste</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>iše</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="čit/ati__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ati</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>aj</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>am</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>aš</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>a</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>amo</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ate</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>aju</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijah</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijaše</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijaše</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijasmo</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijaste</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijahu</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ah</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>a</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>a</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>asmo</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>aste</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>aše</l>
         <r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="videti"><i>vid</i><par n="vid/eti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="misleti"><i>misl</i><par n="vid/eti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="čitati"><i>čit</i><par n="čit/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gledati"><i>gled</i><par n="čit/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="znati"><i>zn</i><par n="čit/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pitati"><i>pit</i><par n="čit/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="moliti"><i>mol</i><par n="mol/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="raditi"><i>rad</i><par n="mol/iti__vblex"/></e>
